District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-218.50

Special requirements for government corporations.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2350, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2132(g), 53 DCR 6899
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-207, § 2(l), 55 DCR 6107
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2222(a), 57 DCR 181
Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(l), 57 DCR 1485
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 14, 59 DCR 6190
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law, 20-108, § 2(bb), 61 DCR 3892

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.181, § 1-301.182, § 1-301.184, § 2-218.13, § 2-218.51, and § 2-218.54.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-192, in subsec. (b)(1)(B), substituted “dollar volume” for “dollar value”.
D.C. Law 17-207 rewrote subsec. (b)(1); and, in subsecs. (f)(3) and (g)(2)(A), substituted “certified” for “local, small, and disadvantaged”.
D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (f), substituted “March 3, 2010” for “October 20, 2005” in the lead-in text, deleted “and” from the end of par. (2), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of par. (3), and added pars. (4 to (6); in subsec. (g), substituted “, volumes, and amounts” for “and volumes”; rewrote subsec. (i); and, in subsec. (j), substituted “Department” for “Commission” twice, and rewrote the last sentence, which had read as follows: “The Commission’s recommendations shall be submitted to the government corporation, the Council, and the Department.”.
D.C. Law 18-141 rewrote subsecs. (f), (g), (h), and (i).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction in (f).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-214, March 6, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 2761).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(k) of the Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-96, January 29, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 3403).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2350 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(g) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(g) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-513, October 25, 2006, 53 DCR 9091).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-575, December 19, 2006, 54 DCR 24).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(g) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(k) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-156, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10919).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(k) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-251, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1259).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2222(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2222(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.